Hawaii statutes.
§49-21 General laws applicable. The
provisions of part III of chapter 47, relating to lost, stolen, destroyed, or
defaced bonds, and to lost, stolen, destroyed, or defaced coupons, to the
extent that they are applicable, shall apply to revenue bonds issued pursuant
to this chapter. [L 1989, c 80, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next